en: rye
af: rog
am: ኣጃ
ar: شيلم مزروع
az: əkin çovdarı
ba: арыш
be: жыта, жыта пасяўное
bg: ръж
bn: রাই
bo: གྲོ་ནག
br: segal
bs: raž
ca: sègol
ce: ӏаьржа кӏа
cs: žito, žito seté, žitné
cv: ыраш
cy: rhyg
da: rug
de: Roggen
el: σίκαλη
eo: sekalo
es: centeno
et: rukis
eu: zekale
fa: چاودار
fi: ruis
fo: rugur
fr: seigle
fy: rogge
ga: seagal
gl: centeo
he: שיפון
hi: नीवारिका
hr: raž, raži
hu: rozs
hy: աշորա
ia: secale
id: gandum hitam
io: sekalo
is: rúgur
it: segale
ja: ライムギ
ka: ჭვავი
kk: мәдени қарабидай, Mädenï qarabïdaý, مادەنىي قارابىيداي, qarabıyday, қарабидай
ko: 호밀
ku: açar, şilêl, شلێل
ky: кара буудай
la: secale cereale
lb: kar
li: rogke
lt: rugys, rugiai
lv: rudzi
mg: Rye
mk: ’рж
ml: വരക്
mn: таримал хөх тариа
ms: rai
mt: segala
nb: rug
nl: rogge
nn: rug
oc: segal
os: сылмæнæу
pl: żyto, żytnia, żytnie, żytni, żytnim, żytniego, żyta
pt: centeio
qu: sintinu
ro: secară
ru: рожь
se: rogaš
sh: raž
sk: raž, raž siata
sl: rž
sq: thekra
sr: раж, raž
sv: råg
sw: ngano nyekundu
ta: புல்லரிசி
th: ข้าวไรย์
tr: çavdar
tt: арыш
uk: жито, жито посівне
ur: تلخہ
uz: javdar
vi: lúa mạch đen
wa: swele
yi: קארן
zh: 裸麥

en: rye flakes
bg: ръжени люспи
da: rugflager, ruggryn
de: Roggenflocken
es: copos de centeno
fi: ruishiutale
fr: flocons de seigle
hr: ražene pahuljice
hu: rozspehely
it: fiocchi di segale
ja: ライ麦フレーク
lt: ruginiai dribsniai, rugių dribsniai
nb: rugflak
nl: roggevlokken
pl: płatki żytnie, płatków żytnich
pt: flocos de centeio
ro: fulgi de secară
sv: rågflingor

en: whole grain rye flakes, wholemeal rye flakes
de: Vollkorn-Roggenflocken, Roggenvollkornflocken
es: copos integrales de centeno
fi: täysjyväruishiutale
fr: flocons de seigle complet
hr: pahuljice raži od cijelog zrna, integralne ražene pahuljice
it: fiocchi di segale integrali
pl: płatki żytnie pełnoziarniste
pt: flocos integrais de centeio

en: rye grain, rye grains
bg: ръжени зърна
da: rugkorn
de: Roggenkörner
es: granos de centeno, grañones completos de centeno
hr: zrna raži
it: chicchi di segale
nl: roggegraan, roggegranen
sv: rågkorn

en: rye kernels
da: rugkerner
sv: rågkärnor

en: rye bran
bg: ръжени трици
ca: segó de sègol
da: rugklid
de: Roggenkleie, Roggenschrot
el: πίτυρο βρίζας
es: salvado de centeno
fi: ruislese
fr: son de seigle, seigle broyé
hr: ražene mekinje
hu: rozskorpa
it: crusca di segale
nl: roggezemelen
pl: otręby żytnie
pt: sêmea de centeio, resíduo de centeio
ru: ржаные отруби
sv: rågkli, rågkross

en: malted rye flakes
fr: flocons de seigle malté
hr: sladne ražene pahuljice
it: fiocchi di segale maltati
nl: roggemoutvlokken

en: malted rye flour
hr: sladno raženo brašno
it: farina di segale maltata
pl: mąka ze słodu żytniego, mąka słodowa żytnia

en: wholemeal rye
bg: пълнозърнеста ръж
de: Vollkornroggen, Roggenvollkorn
es: centeno integral
fi: täysjyväruis
fr: seigle complet
hr: integralna raž
hu: teljes kiőrlésű rozs
it: Segale integrale
nl: volkorenrogge
sv: fullkornsråg, fullkorn av råg

en: malted wholemeal rye flakes
de: Gemahlene Vollkornroggenflocken
fi: mallastettu täysjyväruishiutale
hr: sladne integralne ražene pahuljice
it: fiocchi di segale integrale maltati

en: malted wholemeal rye flour
de: Gemahlenes Vollkornroggenmehl
fi: mallastettu täysjyväruisjauho
hr: sladno integralno raženo brašno
it: farina di segale integrale maltata
ru: мука ржаная хлебопекарная обдирная, мука ржаная обдирная, мука ржаная хлебопекарная обойная

en: malted wholemeal rye flakes and flour
de: Gemahlenes Vollkornroggenmehl und -flocken
fi: mallastettu täysjyväruishiutale ja -jauho
hr: sladne integralne ražene pahuljice i brašno
it: fiocchi di segale integrale maltata e farina

en: wholemeal rye groats
da: groftmalet fuldkornsrugmel
de: Roggenvollkornschrot
fi: täysjyväruisrouhe, täysjyväruisrouhetta
hr: integralna ražena krupica
it: semola integrale di segale
sv: fullkornsrågkross

en: rye malt, malta de centeno
de: Roggenmalz
fi: ruismallas
fr: malt de seigle
hr: raženi slad
hu: rozsmaláta
it: malto di segale
lv: rudzu iesals
nl: roggemout
pl: słód żytni
ru: солод ржаной
sv: rågmalt, malt av råg

en: rye malt extract
de: Roggenmalzextrakt
fi: ruismallasuute
hr: ekstrakt raženog slada
hu: rozsmaláta kivonat
it: estratto di malto di segale

en: rye malt grist
de: roggenmalzschrot
fi: ruismallasrouhe, kaljamallas
hr: raženi slad grist
it: grist di malto di segale
sv: rågmaltkross

en: fermented rye malt
hr: fermentirani raženi slad
it: malto di segale fermentato
ru: солод ржаной ферментированный

en: ground rye malt
de: Roggenmalz gemahlen
es: malta molida de centeno
hr: mljeveni raženi slad
it: malto di segale macinato

en: rye fiber
de: Roggen-Ballaststoffe
fi: ruiskuitu
hr: vlakna raži
it: fibra di segale
nl: roggevezel
sv: rågfiber

en: scalding
sv: skållning